test/src/morphology/N-laeteq11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - läteq: # Noun (11) läteq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     läteq+N+Sg+Nom: läteq
     läteq+N+Sg+Gen: lätte
     läteq+N+Sg+Par: lätet
     läteq+N+Sg+Ill: lättehe
     läteq+N+Pl+Gen: [lättide, lätete]
     läteq+N+Pl+Par: lättit
     läteq+N+Pl+Ill: [lättihe, lätetehe]
     läteq+N+Pl+All: [lättile, lätetele]
